Washington statutes.
RCW 14.16.040

Possession of license.

The certificate of the license herein required shall be kept in the personal possession of the licensee when he or she is serving as an airman or airwoman within this state, and must be presented for inspection upon the demand of any passenger, any peace officer of this state, or any official, manager, or person in charge of any airport or landing field in this state upon which he or she shall land.

[ 2010 c 8 s 5008; 1929 c 157 s 4; RRS s 2722-4.]